Utah statutes.
70A-2-806.   Resale or release of returned assistive technology -- Prohibition.

Assistive technology which is replaced by a manufacturer under this chapter or under a similar law of another state may not be sold or leased again in this state unless full written disclosure of the reason for return is made to any prospective purchaser or lessee.

